Hawaii statutes.
§431:5-303 Active life reserves and
unearned premium reserves for noncancellable disability insurance. (a)
The legal minimum standard for computing the active life reserve, including the
unearned premium reserve, of noncancellable disability policies shall be based
on conference modification of class III disability experience with interest not
to exceed three and one-half per cent a year on the full preliminary term
basis.

(b) The tables shall be extended to cover the
provisions of such policies on such bases as the commissioner may approve for
policies:

(1) With a waiting period of less than three months;
or

(2) Providing benefits at ages beyond the limits of
conference modification of class III disability experience.

(c) The reserve for losses under
noncancellable disability policies shall be based on conference modification of
class III disability experience, except that for claims of less than
twenty-seven months' duration, the reserve may be taken as equivalent to the
prospective claim payments for three and one-half times the elapsed period of
disability. In no case shall the reserve be less than the equivalent of seven
weeks' claim payments.

(d) The commissioner shall modify the
application of the tables and requirements prescribed in this section to
policies or to claims arising under policies in accordance with the waiting
period contained in such policies and in accordance with any limitation as to
the time for which indemnity is payable. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next